incubator/apertium-sme-smj.sme.dix
    <pardef n="Ivguba/hta__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>htan</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>đain</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>htii</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hta</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>đa</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>đa</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>đas</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>đaiguin</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>đaide</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>đat</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>đaid</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>đaid</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>đain</l>
          <r>hta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ráisduo/ttar__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttarin</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddariin</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddarii</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttar</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddara</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddara</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddaris</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddariiguin</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddariidda</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddarat</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddariid</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddariid</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddariin</l>
          <r>ttar<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Be/ardu__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ardun</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arduin</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rdui</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ardu</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ardu</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ardu</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ardus</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arduiguin</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arduide</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ardut</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arduid</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arduid</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arduin</l>
          <r>ardu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Est/i__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiin</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ái</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tis</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiiguin</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiide</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tit</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiid</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiid</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiin</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Ákšovuonbahta"><i>Ákšovuonba</i><par n="Ivguba/hta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Esti"><i>Est</i><par n="Est/i__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hardangerduottar"><i>Hardangerduo</i><par n="Ráisduo/ttar__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Idjavuonduottar"><i>Idjavuonduo</i><par n="Ráisduo/ttar__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ivguvuonbahta"><i>Ivguvuonba</i><par n="Ivguba/hta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ivgubahta"><i>Ivguba</i><par n="Ivguba/hta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Lágesduottar"><i>Lágesduo</i><par n="Ráisduo/ttar__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Mearrabahta"><i>Mearraba</i><par n="Ivguba/hta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Muotkeduottar"><i>Muotkeduo</i><par n="Ráisduo/ttar__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Báišduottar"><i>Báišduo</i><par n="Ráisduo/ttar__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Beardu"><i>Be</i><par n="Be/ardu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ovnnesduottar"><i>Ovnnesduo</i><par n="Ráisduo/ttar__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ráisduottar"><i>Ráisduo</i><par n="Ráisduo/ttar__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sáltoduottar"><i>Sáltoduo</i><par n="Ráisduo/ttar__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Vuonnabahta"><i>Vuonnaba</i><par n="Ivguba/hta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Vuotnabahta"><i>Vuotnaba</i><par n="Ivguba/hta__N_Prop"/></e>
